New Jersey, session 221, A3581.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section, time-to-degree completion means the time elapsed between the students initial enrollment in a four-year public institution of higher education and the degree conferral date. b.  A four-year public institution of higher education shall provide for inspection on its website the average time-to-degree completion for each baccalaureate degree awarded by the institution. c.  A county college shall provide for inspection on its website an appropriate measure of student outcomes, as determined by the Secretary of Higher Education, in consultation with the New Jersey Council of County Colleges, for each associate degree awarded by the institution. 2.    a.  A public institution of higher education shall provide for public inspection on its website a copy of the institutions annual fiscal monitoring report submitted pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2023, c.115 (C.18A:3B-53.2)1; a copy of any comprehensive audit completed pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2023, c.115 (C.18A:3B-53.3;1 and, as applicable, a copy of the institutions annual audit submitted pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2009, c.308 (C.18A:3B-51). b.  An institution shall annually submit a direct website link of the information required pursuant to subsection a. of this section to the Secretary of Higher Education. c.   An institution shall post on its website a summary of the information required pursuant to subsection a. of this section for the public that is clear, simple, and understandable. 3.    The secretary shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full academic year following enactment.